es: Interfaz de host: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB tipo C; eSATA; Otros
nb: Vertsgrensesnitt: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Annet
cs: Hostitelské rozhraní: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB Type-C; eSATA; Jiné
fi: Isäntäkäyttöliittymä: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB tyyppi C; eSATA; Muu
pt-PT: Interface de anfitrião: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Geração 1; USB 3.2 Geração 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Outro
pt-BR: Interface de host: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 geração 1; USB 3.2 geração 2; USB tipo C; eSATA; Outro
zh-CN: 主机接口: 火线 (IEEE 1394); SATA; 雷电接口 2; 雷电接口 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 第 1 代; USB 3.2 第 2 代; USB C 型; eSATA; 其他
lt-LT: Sąsaja su kompiuteriu: „Firewire“ (IEEE 1394); SATA; „Thunderbolt 2“; „Thunderbolt 3“; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB C tipo; eSATA; Kita
nl: Hostinterface: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Andere
pl: Interfejs hosta: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB typu C; eSATA; Inne
sk-SK: Hostiteľské rozhranie: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB typu C; eSATA; Iné
sl-SI: Vmesnik gostitelja: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB tipa C; eSATA; Drugo
hr-HR: Sučelje glavnog računala: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 prve generacije; USB 3.2 druge generacije; USB tip-C; eSATA; Ostalo
bg-BG: Интерфейс на хоста: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Други
fr: Interface hôte: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 génération 1; USB 3.2 génération 2; USB type C; eSATA; Autre
vi: Giao diện máy chủ: Firewire (IEEE 1394); Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB type-C; Biến thể của chuẩn kết nối SATA; Khác
en: Host interface: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Other
de: Host-Schnittstelle: FireWire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB-Typ-C; eSATA; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 主機介面: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB Type-C; eSATA; 其他
da: Værtsgrænseflade: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Andet
ro-RO: Interfață host: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB tip C; eSATA; Altele
sv: Värdgränssnitt: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB typ-C; eSATA; Övrigt
it: Interfaccia host: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB tipo C; eSATA; Altro
el: Διεπαφή κεντρικού υπολογιστή: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.2 gen 2; USB type-C; eSATA; Άλλο
th: โฮสต์อินเทอร์เฟซ: ไฟร์ไวร์ (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB Type-C; eSATA; อื่นๆ
hu: Gazda interfész: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 gen 1; USB 3.1 gen 2; USB-C; eSATA; Egyéb
tr: Ana Bilgisayar Arayüzü: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB C tipi; eSATA; Diğer
ko: 호스트 인터페이스: Firewire(IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB 타입-C; eSATA; 기타
ja: ホストインターフェース: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; サンダーボルト2; サンダーボルト3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USBタイプC; eSATA; その他
ru: Интерфейс хоста: Firewire (IEEE 1394); SATA; Thunderbolt 2; Thunderbolt 3; USB 2.0; USB 3.1 Gen 1; USB 3.2 Gen 2; USB Type-C; eSATA; Другой